Florida, session 2026, SB722.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âPresent paragraph (b) of subsection (2) and 20 present subsections (3) through (15) of section 553.899, Florida 21 Statutes, are redesignated as paragraph (c) of subsection (2) 22 and subsections (4) through (16), respectively, a new paragraph 23 (b) is added to subsection (2) of that section, a new subsection 24 (3) is added to that section, and paragraph (d) of present 25 subsection (3) and present subsections (6), (7), and (13) of 26 that section are amended, to read: 27 553.899âMandatory structural inspections for condominium 28 and cooperative buildings.â 29 (2)âAs used in this section, the terms: 30 (b)ââStructural integrity reserve studyâ has the same 31 meaning as in s. 718.103. 32 (3)(a)âCondominium associations that govern a building that 33 is six stories or more in height, as determined by the Florida 34 Building Code, must conduct a structural integrity reserve study 35 of the building for the purpose of estimating future 36 maintenance, repair, and replacement costs of common elements 37 and funding adequate reserves based on the findings of the 38 study. 39 (b)âCondominium associations that govern a building that is 40 five stories or less in height, as determined by the Florida 41 Building Code, are not required to conduct a structural 42 integrity reserve study of the building and may, by a majority 43 vote of the unit owners present at a duly called meeting, elect 44 to waive or reduce reserve contributions. 45 (c)âA structural integrity reserve study conducted pursuant 46 to this subsection must comply with the standards established 47 under s. 718.112(2)(g). 48 (4)(3) 49 (d)âThe local enforcement agency may accept an inspection 50 report prepared by a licensed engineer or architect for a 51 structural integrity and condition inspection of a building 52 performed before July 1, 2022, if the inspection and report 53 substantially comply with the requirements of this section. 54 Notwithstanding when such inspection was completed, the 55 condominium or cooperative association must comply with the unit 56 owner notice requirements in subsection (10) (9). The inspection 57 for which an inspection report is accepted by the local 58 enforcement agency under this paragraph is deemed a milestone 59 inspection for the applicable requirements in chapters 718 and 60 719. If a previous inspection and report is accepted by the 61 local enforcement agency under this paragraph, the deadline for 62 the buildingâs subsequent 10-year milestone inspection is based 63 on the date of the accepted previous inspection. 64 (7)(6)âPhase one of the milestone inspection must be 65 completed within 180 days after the owner or owners of the 66 building receive the written notice under subsection (6) (5). 67 For purposes of this section, completion of phase one of the 68 milestone inspection means the licensed engineer or architect 69 who performed the phase one inspection submitted the inspection 70 report by e-mail, United States Postal Service, or commercial 71 delivery service to the local enforcement agency. 72 (8)(7)âA milestone inspection consists of two phases: 73 (a)âFor phase one of the milestone inspection, a licensed 74 architect or engineer authorized to practice in this state shall 75 perform a visual examination of habitable and nonhabitable areas 76 of a building, including the major structural components of a 77 building, and provide a qualitative assessment of the structural 78 conditions of the building. If the architect or engineer finds 79 no signs of substantial structural deterioration to any building 80 components under visual examination, phase two of the 81 inspection, as provided in paragraph (b), is not required. An 82 architect or engineer who completes a phase one milestone 83 inspection shall prepare and submit an inspection report 84 pursuant to subsection (9) (8). 85 (b)âA phase two of the milestone inspection must be 86 performed if any substantial structural deterioration is 87 identified during phase one. A phase two inspection may involve 88 destructive or nondestructive testing at the inspectorâs 89 direction. The inspection may be as extensive or as limited as 90 necessary to fully assess areas of structural distress in order 91 to confirm that the building is structurally sound and safe for 92 its intended use and to recommend a program for fully assessing 93 and repairing distressed and damaged portions of the building. 94 When determining testing locations, the inspector must give 95 preference to locations that are the least disruptive and most 96 easily repairable while still being representative of the 97 structure. If a phase two inspection is required, within 180 98 days after submitting a phase one inspection report the 99 architect or engineer performing the phase two inspection must 100 submit a phase two progress report to the local enforcement 101 agency with a timeline for completion of the phase two 102 inspection. An inspector who completes a phase two milestone 103 inspection shall prepare and submit an inspection report 104 pursuant to subsection (9) (8). 105 (14)(13)(a)âOn or before December 31, 2025, and on or 106 before each December 31 thereafter, the local enforcement agency 107 responsible for milestone inspections shall provide the 108 department, in an electronic format determined by the 109 department, information that must include, but is not limited 110 to: 111 1.âThe number of buildings required to have a milestone 112 inspection within the agencyâs jurisdiction. 113 2.âThe number of buildings for which a phase one milestone 114 inspection has been completed. 115 3.âThe number of buildings granted an extension under 116 paragraph (4)(c) (3)(c). 117 4.âThe number of buildings required to have a phase two 118 milestone inspection. 119 5.âThe number of buildings for which a phase two milestone 120 inspection has been completed. 121 6.âThe number, type, and value of permit applications 122 received to complete repairs required by a phase two milestone 123 inspection. 124 7.âA list of buildings deemed to be unsafe or uninhabitable 125 as determined by a milestone inspection. 126 8.âThe license number of the building code administrator 127 responsible for milestone inspections for the local enforcement 128 agency. 129 (b)âThe department shall provide to the Office of Program 130 Policy Analysis and Government Accountability (OPPAGA) all 131 information obtained from the local enforcement agencies under 132 paragraph (a) by the date specified and in a manner prescribed 133 by OPPAGA. OPPAGA may request from a local enforcement agency 134 any additional information necessary to compile the information 135 and provide a report to the President of the Senate and the 136 Speaker of the House of Representatives. 137 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.